Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 5 Compensation and Benefits
Click to view table.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 708, § 1; 1995, No. 966, § 1; 1997, No. 530, § 1; 1997, No. 1174, § 1; 1999, No. 1019, § 2; 2001, No. 1462, § 1; 2003, No. 923, § 1; 2003, No. 1473, § 73; 2005, No. 1852, § 1; 2007, No. 376, § 1; 2009, No. 688, § 6; 2011, No. 1017, § 2; 2013, No. 1321, § 1; 2015, No. 1007, § 2; 2017, No. 365, § 13; 2019, No. 981, § 4.